Maryland, session 2026, HB1290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1290*

HOUSE BILL 1290
3–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Child” means an individual under the age of 18 years.
(f) “Child in need of assistance” means a child who requires court intervention
because:
(1) The child has been abused, has been neglected, has a developmental
disability, or has a mental disorder; and
(2) The child’s parents, guardian, or custodian are unable or unwilling to
give proper care and attention to the child and the child’s needs.
(g) “CINA” means a child in need of assistance.
(i) “Court” means the circuit court for a county sitting as the juvenile court.
3–831.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A CHILD
WHO IS THE SUBJECT OF A CINA PROCEEDING UNDER THIS SUBTITLE HAS THE
RIGHT TO BE PRESENT AT THE PROCEEDING.
(B) THE COURT MAY EXCLUDE A CHILD FROM A CINA PROCEEDING IF:
(1) THE THE CHILD’S ATTORNEY:
(I) DETERMINES THAT THE CHILD’S PRESENCE AT THE
PROCEEDING IS NOT IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD; AND
(II) NOTIFIES THE COURT THAT THE CHILD HAS WAIVED THE
RIGHT TO BE PRESENT; OR
(2) THE COURT, AFTER CONSIDERATION AND FINDINGS ON THE
RECORD, DETERMINES THAT THE CHILD’S PRESENCE AT THE PROCEEDING IS NOT
IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD.
(C) BEFORE EXCLUDING A CHILD UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
A COURT SHALL CONSIDER LESS RESTRICTIVE ALTERNATIVES, INCLUDING:
(1) ADJUSTMENT OF THE COURT’S SCHEDULE;

HOUSE BILL 1290 3
(2) REMOTE PARTICIPATION FOR ANY PARTY TO THE PROCEEDING;
(3) TRAUMA–INFORMED SUPPORT FOR THE CHILD; OR
(4) LIMITING THE TIME THE CHILD IS PHYSICALLY IN THE
COURTROOM REQUESTS TO WAIVE THE CHILD’S PRESENCE AT THE PROCEEDING.
(D) (C) THE CHILD’S ATTORNEY MAY NOT WAIVE THE CHILD’S RIGHT TO
BE PRESENT AT A CONSULTATION REQUIRED UNDER § 3–823(J) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.